Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.550

Financial institution service providers—Enforcement.

(1) The director may take enforcement actions against a service provider for planning, attempting, or currently violating any state or federal law, or engaging in any unsafe or unsound practice, to the same extent, and as if, the covered service was performed by the covered financial institution itself, pursuant to Titles 30A, 32, and 33 RCW.

(2) The director may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with other state or federal agencies having joint or concurrent jurisdiction over a service provider.

[ 2022 c 49 s 6.]